Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

209.990.
Penalties.

Anyone knowingly or wantonly violating the provisions of KRS 209.030(2) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor as designated in KRS 532.090. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who knowingly abuses or neglects an adult is guilty of a Class C felony.

Any person who wantonly abuses or neglects an adult is guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who recklessly abuses or neglects an adult is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly exploits an adult, resulting in a total loss to the adult of more than three hundred dollars ($300) in financial or other resources, or both, is guilty of a Class C felony.

Any person who wantonly or recklessly exploits an adult, resulting in a total loss to the adult of more than three hundred dollars ($300) in financial or other resources, or both, is guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who knowingly, wantonly, or recklessly exploits an adult, resulting in a total loss to the adult of three hundred dollars ($300) or less in financial or other resources, or both, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

If a defendant is sentenced under subsection (5), (6), or (7) of this section and fails to return the victim’s property as defined in KRS 218A.405 within thirty (30) days of an order by the sentencing court to do so, or is thirty (30) days or more delinquent in a court-ordered payment schedule, then the defendant shall be civilly liable to the victim of the offense or the victim’s estate for treble damages, plus reasonable attorney fees and court costs. Any interested person or entity, as defined in KRS 387.510, shall have standing to bring a civil action on the victim’s behalf to enforce this section. The sentencing judge shall inform the defendant of the provisions of this subsection at sentencing.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 157, § 9; 1980, ch. 372, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 56, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 370, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 132, § 8, effective June 20, 2005; 2011, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.